Colorado, session 2026A, HB1054.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 2 to article
14.4 of title 8 as follows:
PART 2
WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY
-2- 1054

8-14.4-201. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 2 IS THE "COLORADO WORKER
SAFETY ACT".
8-14.4-202. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 2, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:

(1) (a) "EMPLOYER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
8-4-101 (6).
(b) "EMPLOYER" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT;
(II) A PUBLIC ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-10-103 (5); OR
(III) THE STATE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-10-103 (7).
(2) "LABOR ORGANIZATION" MEANS AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8-3.3-102 (13).
(3) "OSH ACT" MEANS THE FEDERAL "OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY
AND HEALTH ACT OF 1970", 29 U.S.C. SEC. 651 ET SEQ.
(4) "STRINGENT" MEANS A LAW, RULE, OR STANDARD'S OVERALL
EFFECTIVENESS IN PROTECTING THE RIGHTS AND SAFETY OF WORKERS. A
LAW, RULE, OR STANDARD IS CONSIDERED TO BE MORE STRINGENT IF IT
IMPOSES A SAFETY REQUIREMENT OR OBLIGATION ON EMPLOYERS THAT IS
STRICTER OR MORE DEMANDING THAN WHAT IS OTHERWISE IMPOSED BY
LAW OR IF IT PROVIDES FOR GREATER RIGHTS, BENEFITS, REMEDIES, OR
PROCEDURES FOR WORKERS THAN WHAT IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW.
(5) "WORKER ORGANIZATION" MEANS A COMMUNITY-BASED
NONPROFIT OR MEMBERSHIP-BASED ORGANIZATION DEDICATED TO
SUPPORTING WORKERS, ASSISTING WORKERS WITH MUTUAL AID OR
-3- 1054

PROTECTION IN CONNECTION WITH WORK, OR EMPOWERING VULNERABLE
WORKERS.
(6) "WORKPLACE" MEANS ANY PLACE WHERE AN EMPLOYER
REQUIRES A WORKER TO PERFORM TASKS, JOBS, OR PROJECTS FOR
COMPENSATION.
8-14.4-203. General duty to maintain a safe workplace.
(1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL ENSURE THE EMPLOYER'S WORKPLACE IS
FREE FROM RECOGNIZED HAZARDS, WHICH DUTY SHALL BE INTERPRETED
CONSISTENT WITH THE FEDERAL OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION'S INTERPRETATION OF THE GENERAL DUTY CLAUSE OF
THE OSH ACT, 29 U.S.C. SEC. 654 (a)(1), AS OF SEPTEMBER 1, 2025.
(2) AN EMPLOYER HAS THE GENERAL DUTY TO:
(a) ENSURE THAT EACH WORKPLACE IS CONSTRUCTED, EQUIPPED,
ARRANGED, OPERATED, AND CONDUCTED IN A MANNER AS TO PROVIDE
REASONABLE AND ADEQUATE PROTECTION TO THE LIVES, HEALTH, AND
SAFETY OF ALL INDIVIDUALS EMPLOYED OR WORKING IN THE WORKPLACE;
AND
(b) COMPLY WITH STANDARDS FOR WORKPLACE HEALTH AND
SAFETY THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ADOPTS BY RULE PURSUANT TO
THIS PART 2.
8-14.4-204. Enforcement - referral to state or local authorities
- statutory damages - civil action - injunction - withdrawal from
dangerous workplace.
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY REFER WORKPLACE HEALTH
AND SAFETY CONCERNS TO RELEVANT STATE OR LOCAL AUTHORITIES,
INCLUDING THOSE CHARGED WITH ENFORCING BUILDING CODES,
SANITATION, FIRE RISK PREVENTION, AND INDUSTRIAL HAZARD
-4- 1054

PREVENTION.
(2) (a) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, A LABOR ORGANIZATION, A
WORKER ORGANIZATION, OR A PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF
THIS PART 2 MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST AN EMPLOYER THAT
VIOLATES THIS PART 2 FOR ALL AVAILABLE EQUITABLE RELIEF, INCLUDING
THE PREVENTION OF UNJUST ENRICHMENT; INJUNCTION; THE DETERRENCE
OF THE USE OF DANGEROUS MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, OR DEVICES; AND
THE PREVENTION OF FURTHER WORK IN OR OCCUPANCY OF A DANGEROUS
WORKPLACE.
(b) AN ACTION BROUGHT BY AN AGGRIEVED PERSON PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION MAY BE BROUGHT BY ONE OR MORE WORKERS ON BEHALF OF
THEMSELVES OR OTHER WORKERS SIMILARLY SITUATED.
(c) IF A COURT IMPOSES AN INJUNCTION OR A STOP WORK ORDER
LIMITING WORK OR PROHIBITING THE USE OF DANGEROUS MACHINERY,
EQUIPMENT, OR DEVICES OR AN INJUNCTION OR A STOP WORK ORDER FOR
A DANGEROUS WORKPLACE, THE EMPLOYER MUST EITHER:
(I) REASSIGN WORKERS TO WORK THAT DOES NOT INVOLVE
DANGEROUS MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, OR DEVICES AND THAT DOES NOT
OCCUR IN THE DANGEROUS WORKPLACE; OR
(II) PAY WORKERS AT THEIR REGULAR RATE OF PAY FOR AT LEAST
THE FIRST TEN REGULAR WORKING DAYS IF THEY ARE UNABLE TO WORK
DUE TO THE INJUNCTION OR STOP WORK ORDER.
(d) THE COURT MAY AWARD A PERSON FOUND TO HAVE BEEN
AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS PART 2 STATUTORY DAMAGES IN AN
AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION,
EXCEPT IF THE EMPLOYER:
(I) REPEATEDLY VIOLATES THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED
-5- 1054

PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-14.4-205, IN WHICH CASE THE STATUTORY
DAMAGES FOR THE SECOND VIOLATION OR ANY SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION
MUST NOT EXCEED TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS; OR
(II) WILLFULLY VIOLATES THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-14.4-205 OR DEMONSTRATES PLAIN
INDIFFERENCE TO THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION
8-14.4-205, IN WHICH CASE THE STATUTORY DAMAGES FOR EACH
VIOLATION MUST NOT EXCEED SEVENTY THOUSAND DOLLARS PER
VIOLATION.
(e) IN ADDITION TO OTHER RELIEF AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION,
THE COURT MAY ORDER AN EMPLOYER THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION TO
PAY A PENALTY FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-14.4-205. PENALTIES IMPOSED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e) SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE WORKPLACE HEALTH
AND SAFETY FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-31-108 (7)(a). THE PENALTIES
MUST NOT EXCEED ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION, EXCEPT IF
THE EMPLOYER:
(I) REPEATEDLY VIOLATES THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-14.4-205, IN WHICH CASE THE PENALTY FOR THE
SECOND VIOLATION OR ANY SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION MUST NOT EXCEED
TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS; OR
(II) WILLFULLY VIOLATES THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-14.4-205 OR DEMONSTRATES PLAIN
INDIFFERENCE TO THIS PART 2 OR RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION
8-14.4-205, IN WHICH CASE THE PENALTY FOR EACH VIOLATION SHALL NOT
EXCEED SEVENTY THOUSAND DOLLARS.
(f) A COURT MAY AWARD THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, A LABOR
-6- 1054

ORGANIZATION, A WORKER ORGANIZATION, OR A PERSON FOUND TO HAVE
BEEN AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS PART 2 REASONABLE COSTS
AND ATTORNEY FEES INCURRED.
(g) EACH DAY A VIOLATION OF THIS PART 2 CONTINUES
CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE AND DISTINCT OFFENSE, AND EMPLOYMENT OF
ANY WORKER IN VIOLATION OF THIS PART 2 CONSTITUTES, WITH RESPECT
TO EACH WORKER EMPLOYED, A SEPARATE AND DISTINCT OFFENSE.
(h) THIS PART 2 SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REPLACE THE
"WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACT OF COLORADO", ARTICLES 40 TO 47 OF
THIS TITLE 8, AS THE APPROPRIATE MECHANISM FOR ADDRESSING
JOB-RELATED INJURIES.
(i) THIS PART 2 SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF THAT HAS THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OR EFFECT OF
INTERFERING WITH LAWFUL, CONSTITUTIONALLY PROTECTED ACTIVITY OF
THE PRESS, UNLESS SUCH RELIEF IS NECESSARY AND NARROWLY TAILORED
TO REMEDY A SPECIFIC WORKPLACE HEALTH OR SAFETY HAZARD.

8-14.4-205. Rules.
(1) IF, AT ANY TIME AFTER SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, ANY OSH ACT
HEALTH OR SAFETY STANDARD, OR RULE ADOPTED THEREUNDER, IS
REPEALED OR REVOKED, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY, AS SOON AS
PRACTICABLE, ADOPT RULES ESTABLISHING A STATE STANDARD FOR
EMPLOYERS IN THE STATE THAT IS AS STRINGENT AS OR MORE STRINGENT
THAN THE FEDERAL OCCUPATIONAL HEALTH OR SAFETY STANDARD BEING
REPEALED OR REVOKED AS A MINIMUM STANDARD FOR EMPLOYERS IN THIS
STATE.
(2) ANY STANDARD ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF
-7- 1054

THIS SECTION MAY BE ENFORCED THROUGH SECTION 8-14.4-204.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THIS PART 2.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-1302, add (3)
and (4) as follows:
24-31-1302. Worker and employee protection unit - creation
- duties - court order - injunctive relief - attorney fees.
(3) IF A PERSON, OR AN AGENT THEREOF, FAILS TO OBEY AN
INVESTIGATIVE DEMAND, SUBPOENA, WARRANT, OR OTHER INVESTIGATIVE
PROCESS ISSUED OR CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY APPLY TO THE APPROPRIATE
DISTRICT COURT FOR AN ORDER TO EFFECT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
THE APPLICATION MUST STATE REASONABLE GROUNDS ON WHICH THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL BELIEVES THAT THE ORDER IS NECESSARY TO
INVESTIGATE A DEPRIVATION OF A PERSON'S RIGHTS, PRIVILEGES, OR
IMMUNITIES SECURED OR PROTECTED BY THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR
LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE STATE OF COLORADO. IF THE COURT
IS SATISFIED THAT REASONABLE GROUNDS EXIST, THE COURT IN ITS ORDER
MAY:
(a) REQUIRE THE ATTENDANCE OF OR THE PRODUCTION OF
DOCUMENTS BY A PERSON, OR BOTH;
(b) GRANT INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AS NECESSARY TO OBTAIN
COMPLIANCE WITH INVESTIGATIVE DEMANDS, SUBPOENAS, WARRANTS, OR
OTHER INVESTIGATIVE PROCESSES ISSUED OR CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(c) GRANT FURTHER RELIEF AS MAY BE NECESSARY TO OBTAIN
COMPLIANCE WITH INVESTIGATIVE DEMANDS, SUBPOENAS, WARRANTS, OR
-8- 1054

OTHER INVESTIGATIVE PROCESSES ISSUED OR CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) COSTS AND ATTORNEY FEES SHALL BE AWARDED TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL WHERE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SUCCESSFULLY
ENFORCES THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-1303, amend
(1)(b) and (2)(b); and add (3) as follows:
24-31-1303. Worker misclassification - wage determinations
- investigation and enforcement by the unit - coordination with
department of labor and employment.
(1) (b) The unit may investigate and enforce an alleged
misclassification that is not described in subsection (1)(a) of this section
if the unit provides written notice to the division of unemployment
insurance of the unit's intent to pursue a misclassification investigation.
and the division of unemployment insurance:
(I) Declines to investigate the matter;
(II) Has investigated the matter and made a formal determination;
or
(III) Fails to respond to the unit within thirty days after the date
of the notice.
(2) (b) If the division of labor standards and statistics has not
referred a wage determination to the unit, the unit may enforce the wage
determination if the unit provides written notice to the division of labor
standards and statistics of the unit's intent to enforce the wage
determination. and the division of labor standards and statistics:
(I) Declines to pursue enforcement of the wage determination;
(II) Has attempted to pursue enforcement of the wage
-9- 1054

determination and has been unsuccessful in enforcing the determination
in full after the later of twelve months after the determination or the
conclusion of any appeals;
(III) Fails to respond to the unit within thirty days after the date
of the notice; or
(IV) Has not initiated an investigation.
(3) THE UNIT MAY INVESTIGATE AND ENFORCE AN ALLEGED
VIOLATION OF PART 2 OF ARTICLE 14.4 OF TITLE 8.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-101, amend
(1)(i)(XXX) and (1)(i)(XXXI); and add (1)(i)(XXXII) as follows:
24-31-101. Powers and duties of attorney general.
(1) The attorney general:
(i) May independently initiate and bring civil and criminal actions
to enforce state laws, including actions brought pursuant to:
(XXX) Beginning January 1, 2026, part 10 of article 12 of title 38;
and
(XXXI) Section 13-16-126; AND
(XXXII) PART 2 OF ARTICLE 14.4 OF TITLE 8.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-101, amend
the introductory portion as follows:
8-14.4-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 14.4 PART 1, unless the context otherwise
requires:
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-102, amend
(2)(b) and (4) as follows:
8-14.4-102. Prohibition against discrimination based on claims
related to health and safety.
-10- 1054

(2) (b) A contract or agreement that violates subsection (2)(a) of
this section is void and unenforceable as contrary to the public policy of
this state. A principal's attempt to impose such a contract or agreement is
an adverse action in violation of this article 14.4 PART 1.
(4) A principal shall not discriminate, take adverse action, or
retaliate against a worker based on the worker opposing any practice the
worker reasonably believes is unlawful under this article 14.4 PART 1 or
for making a charge, testifying, assisting, or participating in any manner
in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing as to any matter the worker
reasonably believes to be unlawful under this article 14.4 PART 1.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-103, amend
(1) as follows:
8-14.4-103. Principal post notice of rights - rules.
(1) A principal shall post notice of a worker's rights under this
article 14.4 PART 1 in a conspicuous location on the principal's premises.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-104, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
8-14.4-104. Relief for aggrieved person.
(1) A person may seek relief for a violation of this article 14.4
PART 1 by:
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-105, amend
(1)(a), (1)(b)(I), and (2)(a) as follows:
8-14.4-105. Enforcement by the division - rules.
(1) (a) Within two years after an alleged violation of this article
14.4 PART 1, an aggrieved individual or whistleblower may file a
complaint against a principal with the division as specified in this
subsection (1).
-11- 1054

(b) Until the date the division makes a complaint form publicly
available:
(I) An aggrieved individual or whistleblower may file a complaint
of a violation of this article 14.4 PART 1 with the division in any form, by
mail or electronic mail;
(2) The division shall either:
(a) Investigate alleged principal violations of, or interference with
rights or responsibilities under, this article 14.4 PART 1 and complaints
filed with the division by aggrieved individuals and whistleblowers; or
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-106, amend
(1), (2) introductory portion, (3)(a), (3)(b), and (4) as follows:
8-14.4-106. Relief authorized.
(1) An aggrieved individual may, within ninety days after
exhausting administrative remedies pursuant to section 8-14.4-105,
commence an action in district court against a principal for a violation of
this article 14.4 PART 1.
(2) A court may order affirmative relief that the court determines
to be appropriate, including the following relief, against a respondent who
is found to have engaged in a discriminatory, adverse, or retaliatory
employment practice prohibited by this article 14.4 PART 1:
(3) (a) In addition to the relief available pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section, in a civil action brought by a plaintiff under this article
14.4 PART 1 against a defendant who is found to have engaged in an
intentional discriminatory, adverse, or retaliatory employment practice,
the plaintiff may recover compensatory and punitive damages as specified
in this subsection (3).
(b) A plaintiff may recover punitive damages against a defendant
-12- 1054

if the plaintiff demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that the
defendant engaged in a discriminatory, adverse, or retaliatory
employment practice with malice or reckless indifference to the rights of
the plaintiff. However, if the defendant demonstrates good faith efforts
to comply with this article 14.4 PART 1 and to prevent discriminatory,
adverse, and retaliatory employment practices in the workplace, the court
shall not award punitive damages against the defendant.
(4) If a plaintiff in a civil action filed under this article 14.4 PART
1 seeks compensatory or punitive damages pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section, any party to the civil action may demand a trial by jury.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-107, amend
(1), (2)(a), (2)(b), and (3)(a) as follows:
8-14.4-107. Whistleblower enforcement - qui tam - definition.
(1) As used in this section, "whistleblower" means a worker with
knowledge of an alleged violation of this article 14.4 PART 1 or the
worker's representative.
(2) (a) A whistleblower who has exhausted the administrative
remedies pursuant to section 8-14.4-105 may bring a civil action against
a principal for a violation of this article 14.4 PART 1 on behalf of the state
in district court pursuant to this section. The state may intervene in the
action to prosecute in its own name.
(b) At the time that the action is filed, the whistleblower shall give
written notice to the division of the specific provisions of this article 14.4
PART 1 alleged to have been violated.
(3) The proceeds of any judgment entered pursuant to this section
shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Seventy-five percent to the division for enforcement of this
-13- 1054

article 14.4 PART 1; and
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-108, amend
(4) and add (7) as follows:
24-31-108. Receipt of money - subject to appropriation -
exception for custodial money - legal services cash fund - creation -
workplace health and safety fund - creation - definition.
(4) There is hereby created in the state treasury the legal services
cash fund. also referred to in this subsection (4) as the "fund" The
department shall transmit all money received from state agencies as
payment for legal services to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same
to the LEGAL SERVICES CASH fund. The money in the LEGAL SERVICES
CASH fund and all interest earned on such money is subject to annual
appropriation by the general assembly to the department for the direct and
indirect costs associated with providing legal services to state
governmental entities and for any of the department's litigation expenses.
Any unexpended money in the LEGAL SERVICES CASH fund at the end of
the fiscal year remains in the LEGAL SERVICES CASH fund and shall not be
credited or transferred to any other fund.
(7) (a) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT PENALTIES
COLLECTED FOR THE STATE PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF ARTICLE 14.4 OF
TITLE 8 TO THE WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND, WHICH FUND IS
CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE MONEY IN THE WORKPLACE
HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND MAY BE USED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO
COVER DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH:
(I) ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES AUTHORIZED IN PART 2 OF ARTICLE
14.4 OF TITLE 8;
(II) CREATING, DISTRIBUTING, SHARING, AND PUBLICIZING
-14- 1054

MATERIALS DESIGNED TO EDUCATE WORKERS AND EMPLOYERS ABOUT
THEIR OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE FEDERAL "OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND
HEALTH ACT OF 1970", 29 U.S.C. SEC. 651 ET SEQ.; PART 2 OF ARTICLE
14.4 OF TITLE 8; AND RELATED REGULATIONS AND POLICIES; AND
(III) RULE-MAKING CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF ARTICLE
14.4 OF TITLE 8.
(b) (I) MONEY IN THE WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND IS
ANNUALLY APPROPRIATED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR USE IN
IMPLEMENTING THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER MAY INVEST ANY MONEY IN THE
WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND NOT EXPENDED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE PURPOSES OF PART 2 OF
ARTICLE 14.4 OF TITLE 8 AS PROVIDED BY LAW. THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE
INVESTMENT AND DEPOSIT OF MONEY IN THE WORKPLACE HEALTH AND
SAFETY FUND TO THE WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND. ANY
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY REMAINING IN THE
WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND AT THE END OF A FISCAL YEAR
REMAINS IN THE WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND AND SHALL NOT
BE CREDITED OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR ANOTHER FUND.
(c) THE LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-75-402 DO NOT
APPLY TO THE WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND.
SECTION 13. Applicability. This act applies to conduct
occurring on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 14. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
-15- 1054

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-16- 1054